Illinois, session 104th, HB4609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Physical Therapy Act is amended by 5adding Sections 8.7 and 33.5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 90/8.7 new)7    Sec. 8.7. Criminal history records background check. Each 8applicant for licensure under Sections 8, 8.1, and 11 shall 9have his or her fingerprints submitted to the Illinois State 10Police in an electronic format that complies with the form and 11manner for requesting and furnishing criminal history record 12information as prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 13fingerprints shall be checked against the Illinois State 14Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 15record databases now and hereafter filed. The Illinois State 16Police shall charge applicants a fee for conducting the 17criminal history records check, which shall be deposited into 18the State Police Services Fund and shall not exceed the actual 19cost of the records check. The Illinois State Police shall 20furnish, pursuant to positive identification, records of 21Illinois convictions to the Department. The Department may 22require applicants to pay a separate fingerprinting fee, 23either to the Department or to a vendor designated or approved   HB4609- 2 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1by the Department. The Department, in its discretion, may 2allow an applicant or licensee who does not have reasonable 3access to a designated vendor to provide his or her 4fingerprints in an alternative manner. Communication between 5the Department and an interstate compact governing body or 6other entities may not include information received from the 7Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a State and 8federal criminal history records check. The Department may 9adopt any rules necessary to implement this Section. 10    (225 ILCS 90/33.5 new)11    Sec. 33.5. Physical Therapy Licensure Compact. The State 12of Illinois ratifies and approves the following Compact: 13PHYSICAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT 14    SECTION 1. PURPOSE15    The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate 16practice of physical therapy with the goal of improving public 17access to physical therapy services. The practice of physical 18therapy occurs in the state where the patient/client is 19located at the time of the patient/client encounter. The 20Compact preserves the regulatory authority of states to 21protect public health and safety through the current system of 22state licensure.23    This Compact is designed to achieve the following   HB4609- 3 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1objectives:2        1. Increase public access to physical therapy services 3    by providing for the mutual recognition of other member 4    state licenses;5        2. Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's 6    health and safety;7        3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in 8    regulating multi-state physical therapy practice;9        4. Support spouses of relocating military members;10        5. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, 11    and disciplinary information between member states; and12        6. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services 13    with a compact privilege in that state accountable to that 14    state's practice standards. 15    SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS16    As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, 17the following definitions shall apply:18    1. "Active Duty Military" means full-time duty status in 19the active uniformed service of the United States, including 20members of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty 21orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Section 1209 and 1211.22    2. "Adverse Action" means disciplinary action taken by a 23physical therapy licensing board based upon misconduct, 24unacceptable performance, or a combination of both.25    3. "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary   HB4609- 4 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a 2physical therapy licensing board. This includes, but is not 3limited to, substance abuse issues.4    4. "Compact privilege" means the authorization granted by 5a remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to 6practice as a physical therapist or work as a physical 7therapist assistant in the remote state under its laws and 8rules. The practice of physical therapy occurs in the member 9state where the patient/client is located at the time of the 10patient/client encounter.11    5. "Continuing competence" means a requirement, as a 12condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of 13participation in, and/or completion of, educational and 14professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.15    6. "Data system" means a repository of information about 16licensees, including examination, licensure, investigative, 17compact privilege, and adverse action.18    7. "Encumbered license" means a license that a physical 19therapy licensing board has limited in any way.20    8. "Executive Board" means a group of directors elected or 21appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to 22them by, the Commission.23    9. "Home state" means the member state that is the 24licensee's primary state of residence.25    10. "Investigative information" means information, 26records, and documents received or generated by a physical   HB4609- 5 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1therapy licensing board pursuant to an investigation.2    11. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an 3individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the 4practice of physical therapy in a state.5    12. "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds an 6authorization from the state to practice as a physical 7therapist or to work as a physical therapist assistant.8    13. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the 9Compact.10    14. "Party state" means any member state in which a 11licensee holds a current license or compact privilege or is 12applying for a license or compact privilege.13    15. "Physical therapist" means an individual who is 14licensed by a state to practice physical therapy.15    16. "Physical therapist assistant" means an individual who 16is licensed/certified by a state and who assists the physical 17therapist in selected components of physical therapy.18    17. "Physical therapy," "physical therapy practice," and 19"the practice of physical therapy" mean the care and services 20provided by or under the direction and supervision of a 21licensed physical therapist.22    18. "Physical Therapy Compact Commission" or "Commission" 23means the national administrative body whose membership 24consists of all states that have enacted the Compact.25    19. "Physical therapy licensing board" or "licensing 26board" means the agency of a state that is responsible for the   HB4609- 6 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1licensing and regulation of physical therapists and physical 2therapist assistants.3    20. "Remote State" means a member state other than the 4home state, where a licensee is exercising or seeking to 5exercise the compact privilege.6    21. "Rule" means a regulation, principle, or directive 7promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law.8    22. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or 9territory of the United States of America that regulates the 10practice of physical therapy. 11    SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT12    A. To participate in the Compact, a state must:13        1. Participate fully in the Commission's data system, 14    including using the Commission's unique identifier as 15    defined in rules;16        2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and 17    investigating complaints about licensees;18        3. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms 19    of the Compact and rules, of any adverse action or the 20    availability of investigative information regarding a 21    licensee;22        4. Fully implement a criminal background check 23    requirement, within a time frame established by rule, by 24    receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of 25    Investigation record search on criminal background checks   HB4609- 7 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    and use the results in making licensure decisions in 2    accordance with Section 3.B.;3        5. Comply with the rules of the Commission;4        6. Utilize a recognized national examination as a 5    requirement for licensure pursuant to the rules of the 6    Commission; and7        7. Have continuing competence requirements as a 8    condition for license renewal.9    B. Upon adoption of this statute, the member state shall 10have the authority to obtain biometric-based information from 11each physical therapy licensure applicant and submit this 12information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a 13criminal background check in accordance with 28 U.S.C. §534 14and 42 U.S.C. §14616.15    C. A member state shall grant the compact privilege to a 16licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in another 17member state in accordance with the terms of the Compact and 18rules.19    D. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact 20privilege 21    SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE22    A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and 23provisions of the Compact, the licensee shall:24        1. Hold a license in the home state;25        2. Have no encumbrance on any state license;  HB4609- 8 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1        3. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member 2    state in accordance with Section 4D, G and H;3        4. Have not had any adverse action against any license 4    or compact privilege within the previous 2 years;5        5. Notify the Commission that the licensee is seeking 6    the compact privilege within a remote state(s);7        6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, 8    for the compact privilege;9        7. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by 10    the remote state(s) in which the licensee is seeking a 11    compact privilege; and12        8. Report to the Commission adverse action taken by 13    any non-member state within 30 days from the date the 14    adverse action is taken.15    B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration 16date of the home license. The licensee must comply with the 17requirements of Section 4.A. to maintain the compact privilege 18in the remote state.19    C. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote state 20under the compact privilege shall function within the laws and 21regulations of the remote state.22    D. A licensee providing physical therapy in a remote state 23is subject to that state's regulatory authority. A remote 24state may, in accordance with due process and that state's 25laws, remove a licensee's compact privilege in the remote 26state for a specific period of time, impose fines, and/or take   HB4609- 9 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety 2of its citizens. The licensee is not eligible for a compact 3privilege in any state until the specific time for removal has 4passed and all fines are paid.5    E. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee 6shall lose the compact privilege in any remote state until the 7following occur:8        1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and9        2. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse 10    action.11    F. Once an encumbered license in the home state is 12restored to good standing, the licensee must meet the 13requirements of Section 4A to obtain a compact privilege in 14any remote state.15    G. If a licensee's compact privilege in any remote state 16is removed, the individual shall lose the compact privilege in 17any remote state until the following occur:18        1. The specific period of time for which the compact 19    privilege was removed has ended;20        2. All fines have been paid; and21        3. Two years have elapsed from the date of the adverse 22    action.23    H. Once the requirements of Section 4G have been met, the 24license must meet the requirements in Section 4A to obtain a 25compact privilege in a remote state.   HB4609- 10 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    SECTION 5. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES2    A licensee who is active duty military or is the spouse of 3an individual who is active duty military may designate one of 4the following as the home state:5    A. Home of record;6    B. Permanent Change of Station (PCS); or7    C. State of current residence if it is different than the 8PCS state or home of record. 9    SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS10    A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose 11adverse action against a license issued by the home state.12    B. A home state may take adverse action based on the 13investigative information of a remote state, so long as the 14home state follows its own procedures for imposing adverse 15action. 16    C. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state's 17decision that participation in an alternative program may be 18used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation 19shall remain non-public if required by the member state's 20laws. Member states must require licensees who enter any 21alternative programs in lieu of discipline to agree not to 22practice in any other member state during the term of the 23alternative program without prior authorization from such 24other member state.25    D. Any member state may investigate actual or alleged   HB4609- 11 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1violations of the statutes and rules authorizing the practice 2of physical therapy in any other member state in which a 3physical therapist or physical therapist assistant holds a 4license or compact privilege.5    E. A remote state shall have the authority to:6        1. Take adverse actions as set forth in Section 4.D. 7    against a licensee's compact privilege in the state;8        2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 9    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 10    of witnesses, and the production of evidence. Subpoenas 11    issued by a physical therapy licensing board in a party 12    state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses, 13    and/or the production of evidence from another party 14    state, shall be enforced in the latter state by any court 15    of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and 16    procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in 17    proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall 18    pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other 19    fees required by the service statutes of the state where 20    the witnesses and/or evidence are located; and21        3. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from 22    the licensee the costs of investigations and disposition 23    of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against 24    that licensee.25    F. Joint Investigations26        1. In addition to the authority granted to a member   HB4609- 12 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    state by its respective physical therapy practice act or 2    other applicable state law, a member state may participate 3    with other member states in joint investigations of 4    licensees.5        2. Member states shall share any investigative, 6    litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any 7    joint or individual investigation initiated under the 8    Compact. 9    SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PHYSICAL THERAPY COMPACT 10COMMISSION11    A. The Compact member states hereby create and establish a 12joint public agency known as the Physical Therapy Compact 13Commission:14        1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact 15    states.16        2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or 17    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 18    exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the 19    principal office of the Commission is located. The 20    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 21    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in 22    alternative dispute resolution proceedings.23        3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 24    waiver of sovereign immunity.25    B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings  HB4609- 13 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1        1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one 2    (1) delegate selected by that member state's licensing 3    board.4        2. The delegate shall be a current member of the 5    licensing board, who is a physical therapist, physical 6    therapist assistant, public member, or the board 7    administrator.8        3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from 9    office as provided by the law of the state from which the 10    delegate is appointed.11        4. The member state board shall fill any vacancy 12    occurring in the Commission.13        5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote 14    with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of 15    bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to 16    participate in the business and affairs of the Commission.17        6. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other 18    means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide 19    for delegates' participation in meetings by telephone or 20    other means of communication.21        7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 22    calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set 23    forth in the bylaws.24    C. The Commission shall have the following powers and 25duties:26        1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;  HB4609- 14 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1        2. Establish bylaws;2        3. Maintain its financial records in accordance with 3    the bylaws;4        4. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with 5    the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;6        5. Promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and 7    coordinate implementation and administration of this 8    Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law 9    and shall be binding in all member states;10        6. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in 11    the name of the Commission, provided that the standing of 12    any state physical therapy licensing board to sue or be 13    sued under applicable law shall not be affected;14        7. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;15        8. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of 16    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 17    member state;18        9. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 19    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 20    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the 21    Compact, and to establish the Commission's personnel 22    policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 23    qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel 24    matters;25        10. Accept any and all appropriate donations and 26    grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and   HB4609- 15 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; 2    provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 3    appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;4        11. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 5    donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, 6    any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at 7    all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of 8    impropriety;9        12. Sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 10    abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, 11    personal, or mixed;12        13. Establish a budget and make expenditures;13        14. Borrow money;14        15. Appoint committees, including standing committees 15    composed of members, state regulators, state legislators 16    or their representatives, and consumer representatives, 17    and such other interested persons as may be designated in 18    this Compact and the bylaws;19        16. Provide and receive information from, and 20    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;21        17. Establish and elect an Executive Board; and22        18. Perform such other functions as may be necessary 23    or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact 24    consistent with the state regulation of physical therapy 25    licensure and practice.26    D. The Executive Board  HB4609- 16 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    The Executive Board shall have the power to act on behalf 2of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact3        1. The Executive Board shall be composed of nine 4    members:5            a. Seven voting members who are elected by the 6        Commission from the current membership of the 7        Commission;8            b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from the 9        recognized national physical therapy professional 10        association; and11            c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from the 12        recognized membership organization of the physical 13        therapy licensing boards.14        2. The ex-officio members will be selected by their 15    respective organizations.16        3. The Commission may remove any member of the 17    Executive Board as provided in bylaws.18        4. The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.19        5. The Executive Board shall have the following Duties 20    and responsibilities:21            a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to 22        the rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact 23        legislation, fees paid by Compact member states such 24        as annual dues, and any commission Compact fee charged 25        to licensees for the compact privilege;26            b. Ensure Compact administration services are   HB4609- 17 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1        appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;2            c. Prepare and recommend the budget;3            d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the 4        Commission;5            e. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and 6        provide compliance reports to the Commission;7            f. Establish additional committees as necessary; 8        and9            g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.10    E. Meetings of the Commission11        1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and 12    public notice of meetings shall be given in the same 13    manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in 14    Section 9.15        2. The Commission or the Executive Board or other 16    committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, 17    non-public meeting if the Commission or Executive Board or 18    other committees of the Commission must discuss:19            a. Non-compliance of a member state with its 20        obligations under the Compact;21            b. The employment, compensation, discipline or 22        other matters, practices or procedures related to 23        specific employees or other matters related to the 24        Commission's internal personnel practices and 25        procedures;26            c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated   HB4609- 18 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1        litigation;2            d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, 3        lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;4            e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 5        censuring any person;6            f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or 7        financial information that is privileged or 8        confidential;9            g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature 10        where disclosure would constitute a clearly 11        unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;12            h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled 13        for law enforcement purposes;14            i. Disclosure of information related to any 15        investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or 16        for use of the Commission or other committee charged 17        with responsibility of investigation or determination 18        of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or19            j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 20        by federal or member state statute.21        3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 22    pursuant to this provision, the Commission's legal counsel 23    or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed 24    and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.25        4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and 26    clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and   HB4609- 19 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions 2    taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description 3    of the views expressed. All documents considered in 4    connection with an action shall be identified in such 5    minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting 6    shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority 7    vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent 8    jurisdiction.9    F. Financing of the Commission10        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 11    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 12    organization, and ongoing activities.13        2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate 14    revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, 15    equipment, supplies, materials, and services.16        3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual 17    assessment from each member state or impose fees on other 18    parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities 19    of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total 20    amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved 21    each year for which revenue is not provided by other 22    sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be 23    allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the 24    Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all 25    member states.26        4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any   HB4609- 20 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 2    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of 3    the member states, except by and with the authority of the 4    member state.5        5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 6    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 7    of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and 8    accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 9    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 10    by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified 11    or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit 12    shall be included in and become part of the annual report 13    of the Commission.14    G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification15        1. The members, officers, executive director, 16    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 17    immune from suit and liability, either personally or in 18    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 19    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 20    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 21    alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the 22    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 23    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 24    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 25    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 26    to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for   HB4609- 21 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the 2    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that 3    person.4        2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, 5    executive director, employee or representative of the 6    Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 7    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 8    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 9    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the 10    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 11    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 12    Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; 13    provided that nothing herein shall be construed to 14    prohibit that person from retaining his or her own 15    counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged 16    act, error, or omission did not result from that person's 17    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.18        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 19    any member, officer, executive director, employee, or 20    representative of the Commission for the amount of any 21    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 22    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or 23    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 24    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such 25    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 26    within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or   HB4609- 22 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 2    error, or omission did not result from the intentional or 3    willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 4    SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM5    A. The Commission shall provide for the development, 6maintenance, and utilization of a coordinated database and 7reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and 8investigative information on all licensed individuals in 9member states.10    B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the 11contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the 12data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is 13applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, 14including:15        1. Identifying information;16        2. Licensure data;17        3. Adverse actions against a license or compact 18    privilege;19        4. Non-confidential information related to alternative 20    program participation;21        5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the 22    reason(s) for such denial; and23        6. Other information that may facilitate the 24    administration of this Compact, as determined by the rules 25    of the Commission.  HB4609- 23 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee in 2any member state will only be available to other party states.3    D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member states 4of any adverse action taken against a licensee or an 5individual applying for a license. Adverse action information 6pertaining to a licensee in any member state will be available 7to any other member state.8    E. Member states contributing information to the data 9system may designate information that may not be shared with 10the public without the express permission of the contributing 11state.12    F. Any information submitted to the data system that is 13subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member 14state contributing the information shall be removed from the 15data system. 16    SECTION 9. RULEMAKING17    A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 18pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the 19rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become 20binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.21    B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states 22rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the 23same manner used to adopt the Compact within 4 years of the 24date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no 25further force and effect in any member state.  HB4609- 24 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a 2regular or special meeting of the Commission.3    D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or 4rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in 5advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and 6voted upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed 7Rulemaking:8        1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly 9    accessible platform; and10        2. On the website of each member state physical 11    therapy licensing board or other publicly accessible 12    platform or the publication in which each state would 13    otherwise publish proposed rules.14    E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:15        1. The proposed time, date, and location of the 16    meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted 17    upon;18        2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the 19    reason for the proposed rule;20        3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from 21    any interested person; and22        4. The manner in which interested persons may submit 23    notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the 24    public hearing and any written comments.25    F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission 26shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions,   HB4609- 25 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.2    G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public 3hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is 4requested by:5        1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;6        2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or 7    agency; or8        3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) 9    members.10    H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, 11the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the 12scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via 13electronic means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism 14for access to the electronic hearing.15        1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing 16    shall notify the executive director of the Commission or 17    other designated member in writing of their desire to 18    appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) 19    business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.20        2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing 21    each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable 22    opportunity to comment orally or in writing.23        3. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the 24    recording will be made available on request.25        4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as 26    requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be   HB4609- 26 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings 2    required by this Section.3    I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 4of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was 5not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral 6comments received.7    J. If no written notice of intent to attend the public 8hearing by interested parties is received, the Commission may 9proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a 10public hearing.11    K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, 12take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the 13effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking 14record and the full text of the rule.15    L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 16Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without 17prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided 18that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact 19and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule 20as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 21(90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the 22purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must 23be adopted immediately in order to:24        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, 25    or welfare;26        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;  HB4609- 27 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an 2    administrative rule that is established by federal law or 3    rule; or4        4. Protect public health and safety.5    M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the 6Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule 7or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, 8errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical 9errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the 10website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to 11challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after 12posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that 13the revision results in a material change to a rule. A 14challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the chair 15of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no 16challenge is made, the revision will take effect without 17further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision 18may not take effect without the approval of the Commission. 19    SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT20    A. Oversight21        1. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches 22    of state government in each member state shall enforce 23    this Compact and take all actions necessary and 24    appropriate to effectuate the Compact's purposes and 25    intent. The provisions of this Compact and the rules   HB4609- 28 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory 2    law.3        2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the 4    Compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative 5    proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject 6    matter of this Compact which may affect the powers, 7    responsibilities or actions of the Commission.8        3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 9    of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing 10    to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. 11    Failure to provide service of process to the Commission 12    shall render a judgment or order void as to the 13    Commission, this Compact, or promulgated rules.14    B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination15        1. If the Commission determines that a member state 16    has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 17    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated 18    rules, the Commission shall:19            a. Provide written notice to the defaulting state 20        and other member states of the nature of the default, 21        the proposed means of curing the default and/or any 22        other action to be taken by the Commission; and23            b. Provide remedial training and specific 24        technical assistance regarding the default.25        2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the 26    defaulting state may be terminated from the Compact upon   HB4609- 29 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, 2    and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this 3    Compact may be terminated on the effective date of 4    termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 5    offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred 6    during the period of default.7        3. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be 8    imposed only after all other means of securing compliance 9    have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or 10    terminate shall be given by the Commission to the 11    governor, the majority and minority leaders of the 12    defaulting state's legislature, and each of the member 13    states.14        4. A state that has been terminated is responsible for 15    all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred 16    through the effective date of termination, including 17    obligations that extend beyond the effective date of 18    termination.19        5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to 20    a state that is found to be in default or that has been 21    terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing 22    between the Commission and the defaulting state.23        6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the 24    Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the 25    District of Columbia or the federal district where the 26    Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing   HB4609- 30 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, 2    including reasonable attorney's fees.3    C. Dispute Resolution4        1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission 5    shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact 6    that arise among member states and between member and 7    non-member states.8        2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing 9    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 10    disputes as appropriate.11    D. Enforcement12        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 13    discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this 14    Compact.15        2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal 16    action in the United States District Court for the 17    District of Columbia or the federal district where the 18    Commission has its principal offices against a member 19    state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions 20    of the Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The 21    relief sought may include both injunctive relief and 22    damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, 23    the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such 24    litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.25        3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive 26    remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any   HB4609- 31 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    other remedies available under federal or state law. 2    SECTION 11. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE 3COMMISSION FOR PHYSICAL THERAPY PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, 4WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT5    A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which 6the Compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member 7state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, 8shall be limited to the powers granted to the Commission 9relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. 10Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking 11powers necessary to the implementation and administration of 12the Compact.13    B. Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the 14Commission's initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to 15the rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact 16becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously 17adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect 18of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.19    C. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by 20enacting a statute repealing the same.21        1. A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect 22    until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing 23    statute.24        2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing 25    requirement of the withdrawing state's physical therapy   HB4609- 32 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1    licensing board to comply with the investigative and 2    adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to 3    the effective date of withdrawal.4    D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 5invalidate or prevent any physical therapy licensure agreement 6or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a 7non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of 8this Compact.9    E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No 10amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 11upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all 12member states. 13    SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY14    This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to 15effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this 16Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence 17or provision of this Compact is declared to be contrary to the 18constitution of any party state or of the United States or the 19applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 20circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of 21this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, 22agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. 23If this Compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of 24any party state, the Compact shall remain in full force and 25effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and   HB4609- 33 -LRB104 17921 AAS 31357 b1effect as to the party state affected as to all severable 2matters.